District of Columbia statutes.
32-1601

Council findings.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

Many District workers need an integrated workforce investment system to help them assume responsibility for building a better future for themselves and their families.

(2)

A workforce investment system should be consumer-driven, accountable and responsive to the needs of employers and job seekers.

(3)

The goals of an integrated workforce development systems are to:

(A)

Coordinate activities at the state and local levels to increase the occupational skills, employment, job retention and earnings of the workforce;

(B)

Reduce welfare dependency by helping workers obtain employment that will assure self-sufficiency;

(C)

Enhance the productivity and competitiveness of District business and industry;

(D)

Encourage ongoing progress toward work preparation from kindergarten through adulthood;

(E)

Encourage the attraction and retention of high skill and high wage employers; and

(F)

Encourage cooperation among regional workforce development efforts to promote the participation of District residents in the regional economy.

(4)

To implement the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, approved August 7, 1998 (112 Stat. 936; 29 U.S.C. § 2822), the District of Columbia must apply the necessary resources to carry out its assigned responsibilities and must delegate accountability and authority, as allowed under the federal law, to the governing entity of the workforce investment system.

(5)

These objectives are to be accomplished under the direction of the District’s Workforce Investment Council. This Council will enlist the views of a diverse group of business, labor, community, education and government leaders to develop a strategic plan for workforce development in the District of Columbia.

(6)

The strategic plan should provide for the development of a comprehensive, consumer-driven employment and career development system that meets the needs of all members of the workforce, including those entering the workforce for the first time, those in transition to employment and those currently employed who seek to enhance their skills for continued career advancement.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 2, 47 DCR 4644
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 2(a), 53 DCR 6794
Establishment—Workforce Investment Council, see Mayor’s Order 2011-114, July 1, 2011 ( 58 DCR 5868).
D.C. Law 16-191 substituted “Council of the District of Columbia” for “Council” in the introductory language.